src/demo-for-teaching-lexc.txt
Multichar_Symbols

ӧ
+Сущ
+Едч
+Мнч
+Род +Дат +Име

LEXICON Root

N ;

LEXICON N
коми:коми NUMV ;
морт NUMK ;
дзоридз NUMP ;
кар NUMK ;

LEXICON NUMV
+Сущ+Едч: CASE ;
+Сущ+Мнч:яс CASE ;

LEXICON NUMK
+Сущ+Едч: CASE ;
+Сущ+Мнч:ъяс CASE ;

LEXICON NUMP
+Сущ+Едч: CASE ;
+Сущ+Мнч:ьяс CASE ;

LEXICON CASE
+Род:лӧн # ;
+Дат:лы # ;
+Име: # ;
